Missouri, session 2026, HB2681.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 287.280, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 287.280, to read as follows:
287.280. 1. (1) Every employer subject to the provisions of this chapter shall, on
either an individual or group basis, insure their entire liability under the workers'
compensation law; and may insure in whole or in part their employer liability, under a
policy of insurance or a self-insurance plan, except as hereafter provided, with some
insurance carrier authorized to insure such liability in this state, except that an employer or
group of employers may themselves carry the whole or any part of the liability without
insurance upon satisfying the division of their ability to do so. If an employer or group of
employers have qualified to self-insure their liability under this chapter, the division of
workers' compensation may, if it finds after a hearing that the employer or group of employers
are willfully and intentionally violating the provisions of this chapter with intent to defraud
their employees of their right to compensation, suspend or revoke the right of the employer or
group of employers to self-insure their liability. If the employer or group of employers fail to
comply with this section, an injured employee or his or her dependents may elect after the
injury either to bring an action against such employer or group of employers to recover
damages for personal injury or death and it shall not be a defense that the injury or death was
caused by the negligence of a fellow servant, or that the employee had assumed the risk of the
injury or death, or that the injury or death was caused to any degree by the negligence of the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2681 2
employee; or to recover under this chapter with the compensation payments commuted and
immediately payable; or, if the employee elects to do so, he or she may file a request with the
division for payment to be made for medical expenses out of the second injury fund as
provided in subsection 7 of section 287.220. If the employer or group of employers are
carrying their own insurance, on the application of any person entitled to compensation and
on proof of default in the payment of any installment, the division shall require the employer
or group of employers to furnish security for the payment of the compensation, and if not
given, all other compensation shall be commuted and become immediately payable; provided,
that employers engaged in the mining business shall be required to insure only their liability
hereunder to the extent of the equivalent of the maximum liability under this chapter for ten
deaths in any one accident, but the employer or group of employers may carry their own risk
for any excess liability. When a group of employers enter into an agreement to pool their
liabilities under this chapter, individual members will not be required to qualify as individual
self-insurers.
(2) An employer or group of employers subject to the provisions of this chapter
may contract for additional supplemental insurance coverage for volunteer firefighters
injured in the line of duty to cover additional payment of workers' compensation
benefits under the law, including temporary total disability benefits owed under section
287.250, for over and above the statutory amounts allowed under this chapter.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, nothing in this subdivision prevents a
volunteer fire department, a county or regional association of volunteer fire
departments, municipality, or any combination of these, or groups of employers, that
have been granted authority by the division to self-insure their workers' compensation
liabilities, from optionally contributing in part or in whole to the payment of premiums
relating to the additional supplemental insurance coverage. In addition to any other
purpose authorized by law, a county governing body or a municipal governing body
may use proceeds from county and municipal taxes not earmarked for other purposes
for the purposes of providing additional supplemental insurance coverage under this
subdivision.
2. Groups of employers qualified to insure their liability pursuant to chapter 537 or
this chapter shall utilize a uniform experience rating plan promulgated by an approved
advisory organization. Such groups shall develop experience ratings for their members based
on the plan. Nothing in this section shall relieve an employer from remitting, without any
charge to the employer, the employer's claims history to an approved advisory organization.
3. For every entity qualified to group self-insure their liability pursuant to this chapter
or chapter 537, each entity shall not authorize total discounts for any individual member

HB 2681 3
exceeding twenty-five percent beginning January 1, 1999. All discounts shall be based on
objective quantitative factors and applied uniformly to all trust members.
4. Any group of employers that have qualified to self-insure their liability pursuant to
this chapter shall file with the division premium rates, based on pure premium rate data,
adjusted for loss development and loss trending as filed by the advisory organization with the
department of commerce and insurance pursuant to section 287.975, plus any estimated
expenses and other factors or based on average rate classifications calculated by the
department of commerce and insurance as taken from the premium rates filed by the twenty
insurance companies providing the greatest volume of workers' compensation insurance
coverage in this state. The rate is inadequate if funds equal to the full ultimate cost of
anticipated losses and loss adjustment expenses are not produced when the prospective loss
costs are applied to anticipated payrolls. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to
those political subdivisions of this state that have qualified to self-insure their liability
pursuant to this chapter as authorized by section 537.620 on an assessment plan. Any such
group may file with the division a composite rate for all coverages provided under that
section.
5. When considering applications for new trust self-insurers, as described under 8
CSR 50-3.010, the division shall require proof of payment by each member of not less than
twenty-five percent of the estimated annual premium; except that, for new members who wish
to join an existing trust self-insurer during the policy year rather than at the beginning of the
policy year, the division shall require proof of payment of the lesser of the estimated premium
of three months or the estimated premium for the balance of the policy year.
6. Self-insured trusts, as described under 8 CSR 50-3.010, may invest surplus moneys
from a prior trust year not needed for current obligations. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, upon approval by the division, a self-insured trust may invest up to one
hundred percent of surplus moneys in securities designated by the state treasurer as
acceptable collateral to secure state deposits under section 30.270.
7. Any finding or determination made by the division under this section may be
reviewed as provided in sections 287.470 and 287.480.
8. If a group of employers who have been granted self-insurance authority under this
chapter or chapter 537 or a public sector individual employer granted self-insurance authority
under this chapter is deemed insolvent, determined to be insolvent, or files for bankruptcy,
and fails to pay any of its obligations that are owed to an injured employee or an injured
employee's dependent or dependents pursuant to this chapter, whether based upon a
compromise settlement approved pursuant to section 287.390 or based upon an award issued
pursuant to this chapter, the division shall call upon the entire security posted by the group of
employers or public sector individual employer. The division may refer all known losses or

HB 2681 4
cases of the group of employers or public sector individual employer to a third-party
administrator or any such entity authorized in this state to administer the workers'
compensation cases. The third-party administrator or entity to which the losses are
transferred shall have the authority to receive the security proceeds from the division and use
the proceeds, after deducting reasonable administrative expenses, to pay the compensation
benefits owed pursuant to this chapter. The security proceeds shall not be considered state
property and shall not be subject to appropriation by the general assembly. Any unused
portion of the security proceeds shall be returned to the division. The group of employers or
public sector individual employer may apply to the division for release of the unused portion
100 of the security proceeds as set forth in rules promulgated by the division. Neither the division
101 nor any third-party administrator shall be obligated or required to pay any obligations or
102 moneys in an amount in excess of the security proceeds, and neither the division nor any
103 third-party administrator shall be liable for any interest or penalties. The joint and several
104 liability of the members of a group that is deemed insolvent, that is determined to be
105 insolvent, or that files for bankruptcy shall continue and shall not be terminated by payment
106 of benefits under this subsection.
107 9. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of this section shall
108 become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section
109 536.024.
110 10. Any records submitted pursuant to this section, and pursuant to any rule
111 promulgated by the division pursuant to this section, shall be considered confidential and not
112 subject to chapter 610. Any party to a workers' compensation case involving the party that
113 submitted the records shall be able to subpoena the records for use in a workers'
114 compensation case, if the information is otherwise relevant.
✔